District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.28

Prosecutions.

(a)

Prosecutions for violations of this subchapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

(b)

In any prosecution brought under this subchapter, any person claiming an exemption from regulation under this subchapter shall have the burden of providing entitlement to the exemption.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(l)(9), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.28.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.